src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/for_liv_yaml_2023_08_17_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    spleiš+N+Sg+Ine: spleišõs
    spleiš+N+Sg+Ela: spleišõst
    spleiš+N+Pl+Nom: splēšõd
    spleiš+N+Pl+Gen: splēšõd
    spleiš+N+Pl+Dat: splēšõdõn
    spleiš+N+Pl+Par: splēšidi
    spleiš+N+Pl+Ins: splēšõdõks
    spleiš+N+Pl+Ill: splēšiz
    spleiš+N+Pl+Ine: splēšis
    spleiš+N+Pl+Ela: splēšist
    
#"N_108":{"tips":"108","vards":"veis","vcount":"3","bloks":"N","loc":{
    veis+N+Sg+Nom: veis
    veis+N+Sg+Gen: veis
    veis+N+Sg+Dat: veisõn
    veis+N+Sg+Par: veisõ
    veis+N+Sg+Ins: veisõks
    veis+N+Sg+Ill: veisõ
    veis+N+Sg+Ine: veisõs
    veis+N+Sg+Ela: veisõst
    veis+N+Pl+Nom: vēšõd
    veis+N+Pl+Gen: vēšõd
    veis+N+Pl+Dat: vēšõdõn
    veis+N+Pl+Par: vēšidi
    veis+N+Pl+Ins: vēšõdõks
    veis+N+Pl+Ill: vēšiz
    veis+N+Pl+Ine: vēšis
    veis+N+Pl+Ela: vēšist
    
#"N_109":{"tips":"109","vards":"pȯis","vcount":"7","bloks":"N","loc":{
    pȯis+N+Sg+Nom: pȯis
    pȯis+N+Sg+Gen: pȯis
    pȯis+N+Sg+Dat: pȯisõn
    pȯis+N+Sg+Par: pȯisõ
    pȯis+N+Sg+Ins: pȯisõks
    pȯis+N+Sg+Ill: pȯisõ
    pȯis+N+Sg+Ine: pȯisõs
    pȯis+N+Sg+Ela: pȯisõst
    pȯis+N+Pl+Nom: pūošõd
    pȯis+N+Pl+Gen: pūošõd
    pȯis+N+Pl+Dat: pūošõdõn
    pȯis+N+Pl+Par: pūošidi
    pȯis+N+Pl+Ins: pūošõdõks
    pȯis+N+Pl+Ill: pūošiz
    pȯis+N+Pl+Ine: pūošis
    pȯis+N+Pl+Ela: pūošist
    
#"N_110":{"tips":"110","vards":"kiļg","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kiļg+N+Sg+Nom: kiļg
    kiļg+N+Sg+Gen: kilg
    kiļg+N+Sg+Dat: kilgõn
    kiļg+N+Sg+Par: kīlta
    kiļg+N+Sg+Ins: kilgkõks
    kiļg+N+Sg+Ill: kilgõ
    kiļg+N+Sg+Ine: kilgsõ
    kiļg+N+Sg+Ela: kilgstõ
    kiļg+N+Pl+Nom: kīlgõd
    kiļg+N+Pl+Gen: kīlgõd
    kiļg+N+Pl+Dat: kīlgõdõn
    kiļg+N+Pl+Par: kiļgi
    kiļg+N+Pl+Ins: kīlgõdõks
    kiļg+N+Pl+Ill: kīlgiž
    kiļg+N+Pl+Ine: kiļgši
    kiļg+N+Pl+Ela: kiļgšti
    
#"N_111":{"tips":"111","vards":"vȯļg","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Nom: vȯļg
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Gen: vȯlg
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Dat: vȯlgõn
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Par: vȱlgta
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Ins: vȯlgkõks
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Ill: vȯlgõ
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Ine: vȯlgsõ
    vȯļg+N+Sg+Ela: vȯlgstõ
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Nom: vȱlgõd
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Gen: vȱlgõd
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Dat: vȱlgõdõn
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Par: vȯļgi
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Ins: vȱlgõdõks
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Ill: vȱlgiž
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Ine: vȯļgši
    vȯļg+N+Pl+Ela: vȯļgšti
    
#"N_112":{"tips":"112","vards":"täuž","vcount":"20","bloks":"N","loc":{
    täuž+N+Sg+Nom: täuž
    täuž+N+Sg+Gen: täud
    täuž+N+Sg+Dat: täudõn
    täuž+N+Sg+Par: tǟta
    täuž+N+Sg+Ins: täudkõks
    täuž+N+Sg+Ill: täudõ
    täuž+N+Sg+Ine: täudsõ
    täuž+N+Sg+Ela: täudstõ
    täuž+N+Pl+Nom: tǟdõd
    täuž+N+Pl+Gen: tǟdõd
    täuž+N+Pl+Dat: tǟdõdõn
    täuž+N+Pl+Par: täuži
    täuž+N+Pl+Ins: tǟdõdõks
    täuž+N+Pl+Ill: täužiz
    täuž+N+Pl+Ine: täužis
    täuž+N+Pl+Ela: täužist
    
#"N_113":{"tips":"113","vards":"vaŗž","vcount":"26","bloks":"N","loc":{
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Nom: vaŗž
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Gen: vard
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Dat: vardõn
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Par: vārta
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Ins: vardkõks
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Ill: vardõ
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Ine: vardsõ
    vaŗž+N+Sg+Ela: vardstõ
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Nom: vārdõd
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Gen: vārdõd
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Dat: vārdõdõn
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Par: vaŗži
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Ins: vārdõdõks
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Ill: vaŗžiz
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Ine: vaŗžis
    vaŗž+N+Pl+Ela: vaŗžist
    
#"N_114":{"tips":"114","vards":"pierz","vcount":"2","bloks":"N","loc":{
    pierz+N+Sg+Nom: pierz
    pierz+N+Sg+Gen: pierz
    pierz+N+Sg+Dat: pierzõn
    pierz+N+Sg+Par: pīerzta
    pierz+N+Sg+Ins: pierzkõks
    pierz+N+Sg+Ill: pierzgõ
    pierz+N+Sg+Ine: piergõs
    pierz+N+Sg+Ela: piergõst
    pierz+N+Pl+Nom: pīerzõd
    pierz+N+Pl+Gen: pīerzõd
    pierz+N+Pl+Dat: pīerzõdõn
    pierz+N+Pl+Par: pīerzidi
    pierz+N+Pl+Ins: pīerzõdõks
    pierz+N+Pl+Ill: pīerziž
    pierz+N+Pl+Ine: pīerzis
    pierz+N+Pl+Ela: pīerzist
    
#"N_115":{"tips":"115","vards":"võrgõ","vcount":"6","bloks":"N","loc":{
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Nom: võrgõ
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Gen: võrgõ
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Dat: võrgõn
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Par: vȭrta
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Ins: võrgõks
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Ill: [võrgõ, võrgõz]
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Ine: võrgõs
    võrgõ+N+Sg+Ela: võrgõst
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Nom: võrgõd
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Gen: võrgõd
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Dat: võrgõdõn
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Par: võrgidi
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Ins: võrgõdõks
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Ill: võrgiž
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Ine: võrgis
    võrgõ+N+Pl+Ela: võrgist
    
#"N_116":{"tips":"116","vards":"jõugõ","vcount":"2","bloks":"N","loc":{
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Nom: jõugõ
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Gen: jõugõ
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Dat: jõugõn
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Par: jȭgța
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Ins: jõugõks
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Ill: [jõugõ, jõugõz]
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Ine: jõugõs
    jõugõ+N+Sg+Ela: jõugõst
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Nom: jõugõd
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Gen: jõugõd
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Dat: jõugõdõn
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Par: jõugidi
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Ins: jõugõdõks
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Ill: jõugiž
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Ine: jõugis
    jõugõ+N+Pl+Ela: jõugist
    
#"N_117":{"tips":"117","vards":"vȭidag","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Nom: vȭidag
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Gen: vȭidag
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Dat: vȭidagõn
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Par: vȭita
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Ins: vȭidagõks
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Ill: vȭidagõ
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Ine: vȭidagõs
    vȭidag+N+Sg+Ela: vȭidagõst
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Nom: vȭidagõd
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Gen: vȭidagõd
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Dat: vȭidagõdõn
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Par: vȭidagidi
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Ins: vȭidagõdõks
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Ill: vȭidagiž
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Ine: vȭidagis
    vȭidag+N+Pl+Ela: vȭidagist
    
#"N_118":{"tips":"118","vards":"pȭzõ","vcount":"105","bloks":"N","loc":{
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Nom: pȭzõ
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Gen: pȭzõ
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Dat: pȭzõn
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Par: pȭzõ
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ins: pȭzõks
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ill: [pȭzõ, pȭzõz]
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ine: pȭzõs
    pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ela: pȭzõst
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Nom: pȭzõd
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Gen: pȭzõd
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Dat: pȭzõdõn
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Par: pȭzidi
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ins: pȭzõdõks
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ill: pȭziž
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ine: pȭzis
    pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ela: pȭzist
    
#"N_118ʼ":{"tips":"118ʼ","vards":"nǭʼgõ","vcount":"78","bloks":"N","loc":{
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Nom: nǭʼgõ
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Gen: nǭʼgõ
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Dat: nǭʼgõn
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Par: nǭʼgõ
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Ins: nǭʼgõks
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Ill: [nǭʼgõ, nǭʼgõz]
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Ine: nǭʼgõs
    nōgõ+N+Sg+Ela: nǭʼgõst
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Nom: nǭʼgõd
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Gen: nǭʼgõd
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Dat: nǭʼgõdõn
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Par: nǭʼgidi
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Ins: nǭʼgõdõks
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Ill: nǭʼgiž
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Ine: nǭʼgis
    nōgõ+N+Pl+Ela: nǭʼgist
    
#"N_119":{"tips":"119","vards":"aššõ","vcount":"2","bloks":"N","loc":{
    aššõ+A+Sg+Nom: aššõ
    aššõ+A+Sg+Gen: aššõ
    aššõ+A+Sg+Dat: aššõn
    aššõ+A+Sg+Par: aššõ
    aššõ+A+Sg+Ins: aššõks
    aššõ+A+Sg+Ill: [aššõ, aššõz]
    aššõ+A+Sg+Ine: aššõs
    aššõ+A+Sg+Ela: aššõst
    aššõ+A+Pl+Nom: aššõd
    aššõ+A+Pl+Gen: aššõd
    aššõ+A+Pl+Dat: aššõdõn
    aššõ+A+Pl+Par: aššidi
    aššõ+A+Pl+Ins: aššõdõks
    aššõ+A+Pl+Ill: aššiz
    aššõ+A+Pl+Ine: aššis
    aššõ+A+Pl+Ela: aššist
    
#"N_119ʼ":{"tips":"119ʼ","vards":"drūʼošõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Nom: drūʼošõ
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Gen: drūʼošõ
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Dat: drūʼošõn
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Par: drūʼošõ
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Ins: drūʼošõks
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Ill: [drūʼošõ, drūʼošõz]
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Ine: drūʼošõs
    drūošõ+A+Sg+Ela: drūʼošõst
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Nom: drūʼošõd
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Gen: drūʼošõd
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Dat: drūʼošõdõn
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Par: drūʼošidi
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Ins: drūʼošõdõks
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Ill: drūošiz
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Ine: drūošis
    drūošõ+A+Pl+Ela: drūošist
    
#"N_120":{"tips":"120","vards":"kaʼj","vcount":"33","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kaj+N+Sg+Nom: kaʼj
    kaj+N+Sg+Gen: kaʼj
    kaj+N+Sg+Dat: kaʼjjõn
    kaj+N+Sg+Par: kaʼjjõ
    kaj+N+Sg+Ins: kaʼjjõks
    kaj+N+Sg+Ill: kaʼjjõ
    kaj+N+Sg+Ine: kaʼjsõ
    kaj+N+Sg+Ela: kaʼjstõ
    kaj+N+Pl+Nom: kaʼjd
    kaj+N+Pl+Gen: kaʼjd
    kaj+N+Pl+Dat: kaʼjdõn
    kaj+N+Pl+Par: kaʼjḑi
    kaj+N+Pl+Ins: kaʼjdõks
    kaj+N+Pl+Ill: kaʼjži
    kaj+N+Pl+Ine: kaʼjši
    kaj+N+Pl+Ela: kaʼjšti
    
#"N_121":{"tips":"121","vards":"kǭj","vcount":"94","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kōj+N+Sg+Nom: kǭj
    kōj+N+Sg+Gen: kǭj
    kōj+N+Sg+Dat: kǭjõn
    kōj+N+Sg+Par: kǭjõ
    kōj+N+Sg+Ins: kǭjõks
    kōj+N+Sg+Ill: kǭjõ
    kōj+N+Sg+Ine: kǭjsõ
    kōj+N+Sg+Ela: kǭjstõ
    kōj+N+Pl+Nom: kǭjd
    kōj+N+Pl+Gen: kǭjd
    kōj+N+Pl+Dat: kǭjdõn
    kōj+N+Pl+Par: kǭjḑi
    kōj+N+Pl+Ins: kǭjdkõks
    kōj+N+Pl+Ill: kǭjži
    kōj+N+Pl+Ine: kǭjši
    kōj+N+Pl+Ela: kǭjšti
    
#"N_121ʼ":{"tips":"121ʼ","vards":"ǭʼj","vcount":"14","bloks":"N","loc":{
    ōj+N+Sg+Nom: ǭʼj
    ōj+N+Sg+Gen: ǭʼj
    ōj+N+Sg+Dat: ǭʼjõn
    ōj+N+Sg+Par: ǭʼjõ
    ōj+N+Sg+Ins: ǭʼjõks
    ōj+N+Sg+Ill: ǭʼjõ
    ōj+N+Sg+Ine: ǭʼjsõ
    ōj+N+Sg+Ela: ǭʼjstõ
    ōj+N+Pl+Nom: ǭʼjd
    ōj+N+Pl+Gen: ǭʼjd
    ōj+N+Pl+Dat: ǭʼjdõn
    ōj+N+Pl+Par: ǭʼjḑi
    ōj+N+Pl+Ins: ǭʼjdkõks
    ōj+N+Pl+Ill: ǭʼjži
    ōj+N+Pl+Ine: ǭʼjši
    ōj+N+Pl+Ela: ǭʼjšti
    
#"N_122":{"tips":"122","vards":"irm","vcount":"289","bloks":"N","loc":{
    irm+N+Sg+Nom: irm
    irm+N+Sg+Gen: irm
    irm+N+Sg+Dat: irmõn
    irm+N+Sg+Par: irmõ
    irm+N+Sg+Ins: irmõks
    irm+N+Sg+Ill: irmõ
    irm+N+Sg+Ine: irmsõ
    irm+N+Sg+Ela: [irmstõ, irmst]
    irm+N+Pl+Nom: irmõd
    irm+N+Pl+Gen: irmõd
    irm+N+Pl+Dat: irmõdõn
    irm+N+Pl+Par: irmidi
    irm+N+Pl+Ins: irmõdõks
    irm+N+Pl+Ill: irmiž
    irm+N+Pl+Ine: irmis
    irm+N+Pl+Ela: irmist
    
#"N_123":{"tips":"123","vards":"program","vcount":"55","bloks":"N","loc":{
    program+N+Sg+Nom: program
    program+N+Sg+Gen: program
    program+N+Sg+Dat: programmõn
    program+N+Sg+Par: programmõ
    program+N+Sg+Ins: programmõks
    program+N+Sg+Ill: programmõ
    program+N+Sg+Ine: programs
    program+N+Sg+Ela: programst
    program+N+Pl+Nom: programmõd
    program+N+Pl+Gen: programmõd
    program+N+Pl+Dat: programmõdõn
    program+N+Pl+Par: programmidi
    program+N+Pl+Ins: programmõdõks
    program+N+Pl+Ill: programmiž
    program+N+Pl+Ine: programmis
    program+N+Pl+Ela: programmist
    
#"N_124":{"tips":"124","vards":"vȯņ","vcount":"2","bloks":"N","loc":{
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Nom: vȯņ
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Gen: vȯn
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Dat: vȯnnõn
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Par: vȯnnõ
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Ins: vȯnnõks
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Ill: vȯnnõ
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Ine: vȯnsõ
    vȯņ+N+Sg+Ela: vȯnstõ
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Nom: vȯnnõd
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Gen: vȯnnõd
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Dat: vȯnnõdõn
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Par: vȱnidi
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Ins: vȯnnõdõks
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Ill: vȯņņiž
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Ine: vȯņņis
    vȯņ+N+Pl+Ela: vȯņņist
    
#"N_125":{"tips":"125","vards":"kīʼl","vcount":"23","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kīl+N+Sg+Nom: kīʼl
    kīl+N+Sg+Gen: kīʼl
    kīl+N+Sg+Dat: kīʼlõn
    kīl+N+Sg+Par: kīʼlõ
    kīl+N+Sg+Ins: kīʼlõks
    kīl+N+Sg+Ill: kīʼlõ
    kīl+N+Sg+Ine: kīʼlsõ
    kīl+N+Sg+Ela: kīʼlstõ
    kīl+N+Pl+Nom: kīʼlõd
    kīl+N+Pl+Gen: kīʼlõd
    kīl+N+Pl+Dat: kīʼlõdõn
    kīl+N+Pl+Par: kīʼlidi
    kīl+N+Pl+Ins: kīʼlõdõks
    kīl+N+Pl+Ill: kīʼliž
    kīl+N+Pl+Ine: kīʼlis
    kīl+N+Pl+Ela: kīʼlist
    
#"N_126":{"tips":"126","vards":"amāt","vcount":"65","bloks":"N","loc":{
    amāt+N+Sg+Nom: amāt
    amāt+N+Sg+Gen: amāt
    amāt+N+Sg+Dat: amātõn
    amāt+N+Sg+Par: amātõ
    amāt+N+Sg+Ins: amātõks
    amāt+N+Sg+Ill: amātõ
    amāt+N+Sg+Ine: amāts
    amāt+N+Sg+Ela: amātst
    amāt+N+Pl+Nom: amātõd
    amāt+N+Pl+Gen: amātõd
    amāt+N+Pl+Dat: amātõdõn
    amāt+N+Pl+Par: amātidi
    amāt+N+Pl+Ins: amātõdõks
    amāt+N+Pl+Ill: amātiž
    amāt+N+Pl+Ine: amātis
    amāt+N+Pl+Ela: amātist
    
#"N_127":{"tips":"127","vards":"kultūr","vcount":"161","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kultūr+N+Sg+Nom: kultūr
    kultūr+N+Sg+Gen: kultūr
    kultūr+N+Sg+Dat: kultūrõn
    kultūr+N+Sg+Par: kultūrõ
    kultūr+N+Sg+Ins: kultūrõks
    kultūr+N+Sg+Ill: kultūrõ
    kultūr+N+Sg+Ine: kultūrs
    kultūr+N+Sg+Ela: kultūrst
    kultūr+N+Pl+Nom: kultūrõd
    kultūr+N+Pl+Gen: kultūrõd
    kultūr+N+Pl+Dat: kultūrõdõn
    kultūr+N+Pl+Par: kultūridi
    kultūr+N+Pl+Ins: kultūrõdõks
    kultūr+N+Pl+Ill: kultūriž
    kultūr+N+Pl+Ine: kultūris
    kultūr+N+Pl+Ela: kultūrist
    
